District of Columbia statutes.
7-1615

Participant selection and grant award criteria.

(a)

The Department of Health shall establish criteria for:

(1)

The selection of community HIV/AIDS service providers to participate in the initiative; and

(2)

Awarding grants to initiative participants, including a requirement that the fiduciary agent of any collaborative representing a ward must be located in the ward.

(b)

All grants awarded pursuant to the initiative shall be subject to terms and conditions approved by the Department of Health.

History

Mar. 20, 2008, D.C. Law 17-117, § 6, 55 DCR 1282
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5021(b), 57 DCR 181

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-111 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5021(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5021(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).